California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(2) Matching funds are provided by the aquaculture industry. For the purpose of this section, “matching funds” include, but are not limited to, any funds expended by the aquaculture industry before January 1, 2006, for the preparation of a programmatic environmental impact report.

(b) If the final programmatic environmental impact report is prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) for coastal marine finfish aquaculture projects and approved by the commission under the California Environmental Quality Act set forth in Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, the report shall provide a framework for managing marine finfish aquaculture in an environmentally sustainable manner that, at a minimum, adequately considers all of the following factors:

(1) Appropriate areas for siting marine finfish aquaculture operations to avoid adverse impacts, and minimize any unavoidable impacts, on user groups, public trust values, and the marine environment.

(2) The effects on sensitive ocean and coastal habitats.

(3) The effects on marine ecosystems, commercial and recreational fishing, and other important ocean uses.

(4) The effects on other plant and animal species, especially species protected or recovering under state and federal law.

(5) The effects of the use of chemical and biological products and pollutants and nutrient wastes on human health and the marine environment.

(6) The effects of interactions with marine mammals and birds.

(7) The cumulative effects of a number of similar finfish aquaculture projects on the ability of the marine environment to support ecologically significant flora and fauna.

(8) The effects of feed, fish meal, and fish oil on marine ecosystems.

(9) The effects of escaped fish on wild fish stocks and the marine environment.

(10) The design of facilities and farming practices so as to avoid adverse environmental impacts, and to minimize any unavoidable impacts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 36, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Aquaculture Development Section [15100. - 15105.]

15100.

There is within the department an aquaculture coordinator who shall perform all of the following duties as part of the department’s aquaculture program:

(a) Promote understanding of aquaculture among public agencies and the general public.

(b) Propose methods of reducing the negative impact of public regulation at all levels of government on the aquaculture industry.

(c) Provide information on all aspects of regulatory compliance to the various sectors of the aquaculture industry.

(d) Provide advice to the owner of a registered aquaculture facility on project siting and facility design, as
 necessary, to comply with regulatory requirements.

(e) Coordinate with the Aquaculture Development Committee regarding the duties described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 64.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15101.

(a) The owner of each aquaculture facility shall register all of the following information with the department by March 1 of each year:

(1) The owner’s name.

(2) The species grown.

(3) The location or locations of each operation or operations.

(b) The department may provide registration forms for this purpose, may establish a procedure for the review of the information provided to ensure that the operation will not be detrimental to native wildlife, and shall impose a registration fee of five
 hundred forty-nine dollars ($549) to recover the cost of reviewing new registrations. For renewing registrations, the department shall impose a registration fee of two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275). It is unlawful to conduct aquaculture operations or to culture approved species of aquatic plants and animals unless registered under this section. The registration fees specified in this section are applicable to the 2004 registration year and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(c) The annual registration of information required by subdivision (a) is not a project for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, at which
 time the registration fees specified in this section shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (b) as if this section had not been inoperative.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 307, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 20.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15102.

The department may prohibit an aquaculture operation or the culturing of any species at any location where it is determined it would be detrimental to adjacent native wildlife.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15103.

(a) In addition to the fees specified in Section 15101, a surcharge fee of four hundred twelve dollars ($412) shall be paid at the time of registration by the owner of an aquaculture facility if the gross annual sales of aquaculture products of the facility during the prior calendar year exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(b) Each owner of a registered aquaculture facility shall maintain sales and production records that shall be made available upon request of the department to assist the department in the administration of this chapter.

(c) Any person who fails to pay the surcharge fee required in this section
 at the time of registration shall be assessed a delinquency penalty pursuant to Section 15104.

(d) The surcharge imposed pursuant to this section shall be applicable to the 2004 registration year and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, at which time the surcharge fee specified in this section shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d) as if this section had not been inoperative.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 307, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 22.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15104.

(a) If any person engages in the business of aquaculture, as regulated under this division, without having paid the registration fee or surcharge fee within one calendar month of the commencement of business, or, for renewal of registration, on or before April 1 of the registration year, the fees are delinquent.

(b) A penalty shall be paid at the time of registration for any fees that are delinquent in the amount of fifty dollars ($50).

(c) The penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be applicable to the 2005 registration year, and shall be adjusted thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, at which time the penalty specified in this section shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (c) as if this section had not been inoperative.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 307, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 24.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15105.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13001 or 13002, all moneys collected by the department pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and shall be expended solely on the department’s aquaculture program pursuant to this division.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13220, these moneys are available for appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act for purposes of this division.

(c) The department shall maintain internal accountability necessary to ensure that all restrictions on the expenditure of these funds are met and shall provide an accounting of the aquaculture program account balance and expenditures upon request of the Aquaculture Development
 Committee, the commission, or the Joint Committee on Fisheries and Aquaculture.

(d) Revenues pursuant to this chapter may be used only to pay the costs incurred in the administration and enforcement of the department’s aquaculture program.

(e) (1) The department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature on or before February 1, 2022, and every five years thereafter, a report regarding the aquaculture program undertaken using revenues derived pursuant to that program, the benefits derived, and its recommendations for revising the aquaculture program requirement, if any.

(2) As part of the report required by this subdivision, the department shall analyze the fees and taxes authorized by this division to ensure that the amount of the appropriate fee or tax is sufficient to fully fund the aquaculture program. The department may undertake this analysis more frequently than every five years.

(f) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 307, Sec. 8.   (SB 1392)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Stocking Aquatic Organisms [15200. - 15202.]

15200.

The commission may regulate the placing of aquatic plants and animals in waters of the state. Movement of live fish between two registered aquaculturists who are registered for those species does not require a permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15201.

A permit is required to place fish on public or private land or water in any watershed above an established public or private fish hatchery. The department shall deny the permit if there is evidence that water quality and potential disease transfers will be adverse to the established hatchery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15202.

The commission may prohibit the placement of specific species of aquatic plants or animals in designated waters of the state. The prohibition may not include species that are found to be native or that are stocked by the state in a location where prohibition is contemplated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Brood Stock Acquisition [15300. - 15301.]

15300.

Aquatic plants or animals may be legally obtained for use as brood stock from all of the following sources:

(a) A holder of a commercial fishing license.

(b) A registered aquaculturist.

(c) The department.

(d) Imported sources authorized by Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15600).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15301.

(a) The department may sell wild aquatic plants or animals, except rare, endangered, or fully protected species, for aquaculture use at a price approximating the administrative cost to the department for the collection or sale of the plants or animals. The commission shall set this price.

(b) Aquatic plants and animals may be collected by a registered aquaculturist only with the written approval of the department. The department may specify the time, place, and manner of collection and may collect a fee from the aquaculturist in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of processing the approval.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the fee for collecting sturgeon or striped bass broodstock shall be five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 701, Sec. 47.   Effective September 15, 1992.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 72 of Ch. 701.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Leasing of State Water Bottoms [15400. - 15415.]

15400.

(a) Except as prohibited by Section 15007, the commission may lease state water bottoms or the water column to any person for aquaculture, including, but not limited to, marine finfish aquaculture. Upon appropriation of funds for that purpose, or if funds are otherwise available, the commission shall adopt regulations governing the terms of the leases, after consulting with affected stakeholders in a public process. No state leases shall be issued, unless the commission determines that the lease is in the public interest in a public hearing conducted in a fair and transparent manner, with notice and comment, in accordance with commission procedures. Leases issued, and regulations adopted, pursuant to this section shall not be construed to be fishery management plans.

(b) A person shall not engage in marine finfish aquaculture in ocean waters within the jurisdiction of the state without a lease from the commission. Leases and regulations adopted by the commission for marine finfish aquaculture shall meet, but are not limited to, all of the following standards:

(1) The lease site is considered appropriate for marine finfish aquaculture in the programmatic environmental impact report if prepared and approved by the commission pursuant to Section 15008.

(2) A lease shall not unreasonably interfere with fishing or other uses or public trust values, unreasonably disrupt wildlife and marine habitats, or unreasonably harm the ability of the marine environment to support ecologically significant flora and fauna. A lease shall not have significant adverse cumulative impacts.

(3) To reduce adverse effects on global ocean ecosystems, the use of fish meal and fish oil shall be minimized. Where feasible, alternatives to fish meal and fish oil, or fish meal and fish oil made from seafood harvesting byproducts, shall be utilized, taking into account factors that include, but need not be limited to, the nutritional needs of the fish being raised and the availability of alternative ingredients.

(4) Lessees shall establish best management practices, approved by the commission, for each lease site. Approved best management practices shall include a regular monitoring, reporting, and site inspection program that requires at least annual monitoring of lease sites to ensure that the operations are in compliance with best management practices related to fish disease, escapement, and environmental stewardship, and that operations are meeting the requirements of this section. The commission may remove fish stocks, close facilities, or terminate the lease if it finds that the lessee is not in compliance with best management practices, that the lessee’s activities have damaged or are damaging the marine environment, or that the lessee is not in compliance with this section. The commission shall take immediate remedial action to avoid or eliminate significant damage, or the threat of significant damage, to the marine environment.

(5) Before issuance of the lease, the lessee shall provide baseline benthic habitat and community assessments of the proposed lease site to the applicable regional water quality control board or the State Water Resources Control Board, and shall monitor the benthic habitat and community during the operation of the lease in a manner determined by the regional board or the State Water Resources Control Board. The regional board and the State Water Resources Control Board may establish and impose reasonable permit fees to pay for the costs of administering and conducting the assessment and monitoring program.

(6) Finfish numbers and density shall be limited to what can be safely raised while protecting the marine environment, as specified by the terms of the lease, subject to review and amendment by the commission.

(7) The use of all drugs, chemicals, and antibiotics, and amounts used and applied, shall be minimized. All drugs, therapeutic substances, and antibiotics shall be used and applied only as approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for marine finfish aquaculture. The lessee shall report that use and application to the commission on a regular schedule, as determined by the commission, but no less than annually, that shall be included in the terms of the lease. The commission shall review those reports on a regular basis and at least annually.

(8) The commission shall require all farmed fish to be marked, tagged, or otherwise identified as belonging to the lessee in a manner determined appropriate by the commission, unless the commission determines that identifying farmed fish is unnecessary for protecting wild fish stocks, the marine environment, or other ocean uses.

(9) All facilities and operations shall be designed to prevent the escape of farmed fish into the marine environment and to withstand severe weather conditions and marine accidents. The lessee shall maintain records on all escapes in a manner determined by the commission. In the event of more than de minimis escapement, the number of escaped fish and the circumstances surrounding the incident shall be reported immediately to the commission, and the lessee shall be responsible for damages to the marine environment caused by those escaped fish, as determined by the commission.

(10) The lessee shall, at a minimum, meet all applicable requirements imposed by the State Water Resources Control Board and the regional water quality control boards, and shall prevent discharges to the maximum extent possible. Monitoring and testing of water quality shall be required on a regular basis as deemed appropriate by the State Water Resources Control Board or the regional water quality control boards. All inspection and monitoring reports and other records, and all data on the discharge of chemical and biological pollutants shall be kept on file and available for public review.

(c) If a restoration or enhancement plan is submitted to, and approved by, the commission, and that plan, among other things, provides for monitoring and protecting the benthic habitat, the prevention of pollution, and the prevention of adverse impacts on wild fish stocks from disease, parasites, and genetic alterations, subdivision (b) shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Artificial propagation, rearing, and stocking projects for the purpose of recovery, restoration, or enhancement of native fish stocks carried out under either of the following:

(A) A scientific collecting or research permit issued by the department.

(B) The California Ocean Resources Enhancement and Hatchery Program, as set forth in Article 8 (commencing with Section 6590) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 6, for the enhancement of white sea bass.

(2) Nonprofit hatcheries and nonprofit artificial propagation projects operated by, or on behalf of, licensed commercial or sport fishermen and fisherwomen for the purpose of recovery, restoration, or enhancement of California’s native marine fish populations, pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 6900) of Part 1 of Division 6.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or expand the application of any other state law or regulation pertaining to marine finfish aquaculture conducted within the ocean waters under the jurisdiction of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 36, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

15401.

Areas used by the public for digging clams shall not be leased. The department shall designate those areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15402.

A lessee of a state water bottom owns all lawfully cultivated organisms that are described in the application for the lease and produced in the area leased. The lessee has the exclusive right to cultivate and harvest the aquatic organisms in the area leased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 131, Sec. 21.   Effective June 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

15403.

Persons wishing to lease a state water bottom shall make a written application to the commission. An application shall contain all of the following information:

(a) A map showing the area to be leased, its general vicinity, and all ownership and boundary lines in the vicinity.

(b) A description of the organisms to be grown and the culture techniques to be used.

(c) An estimate of the acreage to be leased.

(d) A nonrefundable filing fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

The lessee shall assume responsibility for any infringement on privately owned water bottoms, or water bottoms owned by, or under the jurisdiction of any city, county, or district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1706, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

15404.

(a) If the commission finds that the area applied for is available for lease and that the lease would be in the public interest, it shall publish a notice that the area is being considered for leasing.

(b) The commission shall have legal notices published in a newspaper of general circulation in each county where the water bottom, or any part thereof, is located, describing the area to be leased and the type of operation to be conducted. The publication shall comply with Sections 6060 and 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15405.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), no initial term of a state water bottom lease shall exceed 25 years.

(b) The initial term of a state water bottom lease for marine finfish aquaculture shall not exceed 10 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 36, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

15406.

(a) Each state water bottom lease shall specify a period prior to expiration when renewal of the lease may be requested by the lessee. If during this period the lessee is still actively engaged in aquaculture, as determined by the commission, the lessee shall have a prior right to renew the lease on terms agreed upon between the commission and the lessee. If terms are not agreed upon, the commission shall advertise for bids on the lease. If a request for renewal is not made by the lessee, the commission shall advertise for bids on the lease. The commission shall consider bids only from aquaculturists registered pursuant to Section 15101.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), with respect to any lease of state water bottoms in effect on January 1, 1983, the lessee shall have a prior right to renew the lease. If the lessee does not renew the lease, the commission shall advertise for bids on the lease. The commission shall consider bids only from aquaculturists registered pursuant to Section 15101.

(c) Except as specified in subdivision (d), a lease may be renewed for additional periods not to exceed 25 years each.

(d) A lease for marine finfish aquaculture may be renewed for additional periods not to exceed five years each.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 36, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

15406.5.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), the commission shall award water bottom leases to the highest responsible bidder, if the bid meets or exceeds the minimum annual rent established by the commission, which shall not be less than two dollars ($2) per acre, for all species cultivated, unless the acreage applied for is 10 acres or less, in which case the minimum acceptable rent shall be ten dollars ($10) per acre. The annual rent for any lease in effect on January 1, 1983, for the cultivation of oysters shall be one dollar ($1) per acre until the expiration thereof. The commission may reject any or all bids for the lease of state water bottoms if it deems the rejection to be in the public interest.

(b) Fees for marine finfish aquaculture leases shall, at a minimum, be sufficient to pay for the costs of administering the marine finfish leasing program, and for monitoring and enforcing the terms of the leases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 36, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

15406.7.

(a) In addition to the rent provided in Section 15406.5, every person operating under an oyster lease shall pay a privilege tax of four cents ($0.04) per packed gallon, or fraction thereof, of shucked oysters harvested by the lessee.

(b) If the oysters are marketed in the shell, the tax shall be based on the equivalent yield of shucked oyster meat. In determining the yield of oysters, it shall be deemed that 100 oysters are equivalent to one packed gallon of shucked oyster meat.

(c) The tax imposed by this section is the exclusive privilege tax that shall be imposed on lessees of state water bottoms for oyster cultivation, notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 15003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 701, Sec. 48.   Effective September 15, 1992.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 72 of Ch. 701.)
-------------------------------------------

15407.

The annual rent shall be paid to the department within 30 days of the commencement of the lease and within 30 days of the anniversary thereof. The commission may establish penalty fees for late payment and may cancel the lease if rent is not paid within 90 days of the commencement of the lease or within 90 days of any anniversary thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 131, Sec. 27.   Effective June 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

15408.

The commission shall promulgate regulations governing the termination of leases due to failure to pay rent or improper use of the leasehold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15409.

(a) Upon termination of a lease, for any reason, all structures shall be removed at the lessee’s expense from the leasehold, and the area shall be restored to its original condition. If the lessee fails to remove the structures, the state may remove them and the lessee shall pay the removal costs incurred.

(b) The commission shall require financial assurances of each marine finfish aquaculture lessee to ensure that restoration is performed to the satisfaction of the commission. Financial assurances may take the form of surety bonds executed by an admitted surety insurer, irrevocable letters of credit, trust funds, or other forms of financial assurances specified by the commission, as it determines are available and adequate to ensure the lease site is restored pursuant to this section.

(c) Marine finfish aquaculture lessees shall be responsible for any damages caused by their operations, as determined by the commission, including, but not limited to, reimbursement for any costs for natural resource damage assessment.

(d) Nothing in this section limits the state in pursuing additional remedies authorized by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 36, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

15410.

All leases shall be subject to the power of the Legislature to increase or decrease the rents, fees, taxes, and other charges relating to the lease, but no increase in rent shall be applicable to an existing lease until it is renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 131, Sec. 28.   Effective June 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

15411.

Lessees under a state water bottom lease may not unreasonably impede public access to state waters for purpose of fishing, navigation, commerce, or recreation. The lessee may, however, limit public access to the extent necessary to avoid damage to the leasehold and the aquatic life culture therein.

The commission may prohibit any recreational activity in any aquaculture area subject to a state water bottom lease if it determines that the activity is detrimental to the enhancement of the resource.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15412.

No water bottom lease may be assigned without the prior approval of the commission. Application for approval of a lease assignment shall comply with all of the requirements for an original lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15413.

No person may enter upon any area subject to a water bottom lease in which aquatic life is cultivated, or remove the aquatic life therefrom without the consent of the lessee, or willfully destroy the cultivated aquatic life or any markers intended to designate the boundaries and limits of the leased area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15414.

A water bottom lease may require periodic reports that the commission deems necessary for the proper administration of the state’s water bottoms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15415.

The department shall notify the State Lands Commission of all applications for water bottom leases.

The department shall inform the State Lands Commission of all leases executed, renewed, or assigned pursuant to this chapter, and shall furnish the State Lands Commission with such information concerning these leases that it may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Disease Control [15500. - 15516.]

15500.

Upon the recommendation of the department and after consultation with the Aquaculture Disease Committee created pursuant to this chapter, the commission shall compile a list of diseases and parasites and the aquatic plants and animals they are known to infect or parasitize. All government activities relating to aquaculture disease detection, control, and eradication that do not affect human health and safety are the responsibility of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

15501.

The department may enter, under an inspection warrant issued pursuant to Title 5 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, at any time, any car, warehouse, depot, ship, or growing area where any aquatic plants or animals are held or stored, for the purpose of making an examination to ascertain whether the aquatic plants or animals are infected, diseased, or parasitized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

15502.

The director, in consultation with the Aquaculture Industry Advisory Committee and the Interagency Committee for Aquaculture Development, shall appoint an 11-member Aquaculture Disease Committee consisting of at least six industry producers selected to represent geographic, specie, and other diverse aspects of the industry; two to represent the department; one to represent the Department of Food and Agriculture; an academic scientist who is an expert in aquatic diseases; and one representative of the University of California Cooperative Extension. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be paid their necessary expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15503.

The Aquaculture Disease Committee may recommend regulations to the commission designed to safeguard wild and cultured organisms from the list of harmful organisms compiled pursuant to Section 15500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

15504.

Regulations recommended under Section 15503 and adopted by the commission may include all of the following:

(a) Routine monitoring procedures.

(b) Standardized diagnostic procedures.

(c) A requirement for the confirmation of the diagnosis by the state through at least one other independent and qualified laboratory.

(d) Criteria for ordering quarantine, condemnation, or destruction.

(e) A stated maximum time period between diagnosis and destruction.

(f) Methods to be employed in animal destruction and facility cleanup.

(g) Procedures for determining fair and rapid compensation.

(h) Any other related procedures that the commission may determine are necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

15505.

If any of the diseases or parasites listed pursuant to Section 15500 is found to exist which the director, in consultation with the Aquaculture Disease Committee and consistent with the regulations adopted under Section 15504, deems to be detrimental to the aquaculture industry or to wild stocks of aquatic plants and animals, the director may do any of the following:

(a) Establish the area to be quarantined and list the aquatic plants and animals affected by it.

(b) Post notices describing, as nearly as possible, the boundaries of an area within which specific disease or parasite infestations are found. Notices posted pursuant to this subdivision shall be published once a week for four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the infected area is located. If there is no newspaper of general circulation in that county, then the notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in an adjoining county.

(c) Hold and impound diseased or parasitized plants and animals.

(d) Forbid, prevent, or restrict the movement of all plants and animals subject to the disease or parasite from or into the area, or from place to place within it, during the existence of the quarantine.

(e) Order the destruction and disposal of diseased or parasitized plants and animals consistent with Section 15504.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15506.

Except for those diseases in the list compiled pursuant to Section 15500, infected plants or animals shall not be quarantined or destroyed, unless the director, in consultation with the Aquaculture Disease Committee, finds that an outbreak of aquatic disease among privately cultured plants or animals presents a threat to the aquaculture industry or to fish life or plant life.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15507.

If the director, in consultation with the Aquaculture Disease Committee, finds that a disease is present in a nearby government operated facility or in nearby wild stocks, infected plants or animals in a private aquaculture facility shall not be quarantined or destroyed unless similar action is taken with respect to the government facility and wild stocks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15508.

Reports of those diseases and parasites compiled pursuant to Section 15500 shall be immediately forwarded by the director to the Aquaculture Disease Committee and shall be promptly investigated by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

15509.

No person may move, or allow to be moved, any of the aquatic plants or animals which are subject to a quarantine established pursuant to Section 15505 across the quarantine line which is established, unless the person has first obtained a permit from the director authorizing the movement.

The director may issue a permit after inspection, if the aquatic plants or animals, premises, transportation vehicles, and equipment which are subject to the quarantine established pursuant to Section 15505 are properly cleaned and disinfected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15510.

If the director determines that any disease designated pursuant to Section 15500 exists among domestic aquatic plants and animals, or that aquatic plants and animals have been exposed, or may have been exposed, to the disease, or to the vectors of the disease, in any other state or territory in the United States or in any foreign country, and the importation of aquatic plants or animals from the state, territory, or foreign country may transmit, carry, or disseminate the disease to domestic plants and animals within this state, the director shall notify the commission which may, after consulting the State Department of Health Services and the Department of Food and Agriculture, issue a regulation restricting or prohibiting the importation of the diseased or infected aquatic plants or animals into this state from any other state, territory, or foreign country.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15512.

(a) If aquatic plants or animals are destroyed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 15505, and a claim is submitted pursuant to Section 15513, the owner shall be promptly paid from the General Fund an amount equal to 75 percent of the replacement value of the plants or animals, less the value determined by the department of any replacement stock provided by the department under subdivision (b). If the replacement value is not settled between the owner and the department, the replacement value shall be determined by an appraiser appointed by the director and an appraiser appointed by the owner. Appraiser’s fees shall be paid by the appointing party. Disputes between these two appraisers shall be submitted to arbitration under the Commercial Arbitration Rules of the American Arbitration Association.

(b) If the department provides replacement stock to an aquaculturist whose plants or animals are destroyed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 15505, the amount to be paid to the aquaculturist pursuant to this section shall be reduced by the value of the replacement stock, as determined by the department.

(c) The result of the arbitration or the amount settled between the owner and the department, reduced by the value determined by the department of any replacement stock provided under subdivision (b), may be submitted as a claim by the owner to the Department of General Services pursuant to Section 15513.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 224.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

15513.

Claims against the department arising under this chapter may be submitted pursuant to Section 905.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15514.

No claim arising under this chapter shall be paid where the director, in consultation with the Aquaculture Disease Committee, finds that the claimant’s management practices were negligent or in violation of law, and that the negligence or violation was the proximate cause of the disease or infection prompting the order of destruction or finds the claimant willfully violated any provision of Section 15505.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

15516.

The owner of an aquaculture product who does not diligently pursue the eradication of a disease from its facility when ordered to do so by the director shall be responsible for paying to the director the full costs of the department for all disease eradication efforts conducted by the department to eradicate the disease. Payment of the costs under this section shall not excuse compliance with the provisions of law, regulations of the commission, and orders of the director, nor be a defense in any criminal or civil proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1337, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Importation of Aquatic Plants and Animals [15600. - 15605.]

15600.

(a) No live aquatic plant or animal may be imported into this state by a registered aquaculturist without the prior written approval of the department pursuant to the regulations adopted by the commission.
